Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 12.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1033
State aid; payments;
reports; use; requirements; failure to submit reports; effect; early payments.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act, state aid payable pursuant to the act for each
school fiscal year shall be based upon data found in applicable reports for
the most recently available complete data year. The annual financial reports
and the annual statistical summary of all school districts shall be submitted
to the Commissioner of Education pursuant to the dates prescribed in section
79-528. If a school district fails to timely submit its reports, the commissioner,
after notice to the district and an opportunity to be heard, shall direct
that any state aid granted pursuant to the act be withheld until such time
as the reports are received by the department. In addition, the commissioner
shall direct the county treasurer to withhold all school money belonging to
the school district until such time as the commissioner notifies the county
treasurer of receipt of such reports. The county treasurer shall withhold
such money. For school districts that are members of learning communities,
a determination of school money belonging to the district shall be based on
the proportionate share of state aid and property tax receipts allocated to
the school district by the learning community coordinating council, and the county treasurer shall withhold any such school money in the possession
of the county
treasurer from the school district. If the school district does
not comply with this section prior to the end of the state's biennium following
the biennium which included the school fiscal year for which state aid was
calculated, the state aid funds shall revert to the General Fund. The amount
of any reverted funds shall be included in data provided to the Governor in
accordance with section 79-1031.

(2) A district which receives, or has received in the most
recently available complete data year or in either of the two school fiscal
years preceding the most recently available complete data year, federal funds
in excess of twenty-five percent of its general fund budget of expenditures
may apply for early payment of state aid paid pursuant to the act when such
federal funds are not received in a timely manner. Such application may be
made at any time by a district suffering such financial hardship and may be
for any amount up to fifty percent of the remaining amount to which the district
is entitled during the current school fiscal year. The state board may grant
the entire amount applied for or any portion of such amount if the state board
finds that a financial hardship exists in the district. The state board shall
notify the Director of Administrative Services of the amount of funds to be
paid in lump sum and the reduced amount of the monthly payments. The Director
of Administrative Services shall, at the time of the next state aid payment
made pursuant to section 79-1022, draw a warrant for the lump-sum amount from
appropriated funds and forward such warrant to the district. For purposes
of this subsection, financial hardship means a situation in which income to
a district is exceeded by liabilities to such a degree that if early payment
is not received it will be necessary for the district to discontinue vital
services or functions.

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 24;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 88;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 93;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 44;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 73;

Laws 1994, LB 1290, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3824;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 679;

Laws 1997, LB 710, § 18;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 36;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 94;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 92;

Laws 2009, LB392, § 12.